District of Columbia statutes.
9-451.01

Repealed

Contracts for repair or construction of streets, avenues, alleys, or sewers — Advertisement; lowest responsible bidder accepted

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(b), 32 DCR 7396
1981 Ed., §§ 7-601 to 7-603.